Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-1104
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody
Act, the definitions in sections 71-1105 to 71-1116 apply.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 30.